Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE G. NON-BACCALAUREATE SYSTEM

CHAPTER 136. TEXAS INNOVATIVE ADULT CAREER EDUCATION GRANT PROGRAM

Sec. 136.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Coordinating board" means the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(1-a) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(a), Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as an organization described by Section 501(c)(3) of that code.

(2) "Nonprofit workforce intermediary and job training organization" means a nonprofit organization that engages in comprehensive long-term job training in partnership with a public junior college, public state college, or public technical institute and provides labor market intermediary services to participant students.

(3) "Program" means the Texas Innovative Adult Career Education (ACE) Grant Program established under Section 136.005.

(4) "Public junior college," "public state college," and "public technical institute" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

(5) "Veteran" means a person who has served in:

(A) the army, navy, air force, coast guard, or marine corps of the United States;

(B) the state military forces as defined by Section 431.001, Government Code, other than the Texas State Guard; or

(C) an auxiliary service of one of those branches of the armed forces.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 859 (H.B. 437), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 48 (H.B. 626), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 47, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 136.003. TEXAS INNOVATIVE ADULT CAREER EDUCATION (ACE) GRANT FUND. (a) The comptroller shall establish the Texas Innovative Adult Career Education (ACE) Grant fund as a dedicated account in the general revenue fund.

(b) The following amounts shall be deposited in the fund:

(1) any amounts appropriated by the legislature for the fund for purposes of this chapter;

(2) interest earned on the investment of money in the fund; and

(3) gifts, grants, and other donations received for the fund.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 859 (H.B. 437), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 136.005. TEXAS INNOVATIVE ADULT CAREER EDUCATION (ACE) GRANT PROGRAM. (a) The coordinating board shall establish and administer the Texas Innovative Adult Career Education (ACE) Grant Program to provide grants to:

(1) eligible nonprofit workforce intermediary and job training organizations; and

(2) eligible nonprofit organizations providing job training to veterans.

(a-1) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 52, eff. September 1, 2023.

(b) Grants may be awarded under this chapter from the Texas Innovative Adult Career Education (ACE) Grant fund only to develop, support, or expand programs of eligible nonprofit workforce intermediary and job training organizations and of eligible nonprofit organizations providing job training to veterans to prepare low-income students or veterans, as applicable, to enter careers in high-demand and significantly higher-earning occupations.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 859 (H.B. 437), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 48 (H.B. 626), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 48, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 52, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 136.006. ELIGIBLE ORGANIZATIONS. (a) To be eligible for a grant under the program, a nonprofit workforce intermediary and job training organization must:

(1) apply to the coordinating board in the manner prescribed by the coordinating board;

(2) provide to eligible low-income students, in partnership with public junior colleges, public state colleges, or public technical institutes:

(A) job training; and

(B) a continuum of services designed to move a program participant from application to employment, including outreach, assessment, case management, support services, and career placement;

(3) be governed by a board or other governing structure that includes recognized leaders of broad-based community organizations and executive-level or managerial-level members of the local business community;

(4) demonstrate to the satisfaction of the coordinating board that the organization's program has achieved or will achieve the following measures of success among program participants:

(A) above-average completion of developmental education among participating public junior college, public state college, or public technical institute students;

(B) above-average persistence rates among participating public junior college, public state college, or public technical institute students;

(C) above-average certificate or degree completion rates by participating students within a three-year period compared to demographically comparable public junior college, public state college, and public technical institute students; and

(D) entry into careers with significantly higher earnings for program participants than previously achieved; and

(5) provide matching funds in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

(a-1) To be eligible for a grant under the program, a nonprofit organization providing job training services to veterans must:

(1) apply to the coordinating board in the manner prescribed by the coordinating board;

(2) provide to veterans, in partnership with public junior colleges, public state colleges, or public technical institutes:

(A) job training; and

(B) a continuum of services designed to move a program participant from application to employment, including outreach, assessment, case management, support services, and career placement;

(3) be governed by a board or other governing structure that includes recognized leaders of broad-based community organizations and executive-level or managerial-level members of the local business community;

(4) demonstrate to the satisfaction of the coordinating board that the organization's program has achieved or will achieve the following measures of success among program participants:

(A) the measures prescribed by Subsections (a)(4)(A)-(C);

(B) rapid attainment of civilian workforce credentials; and

(C) entry into careers with significantly higher earnings for program participants than previously achieved; and

(5) provide matching funds in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

(b) The matching funds required under Subsection (a)(5) or (a-1)(5) may be obtained from any source available to the organization, including in-kind contributions, community or foundation grants, individual contributions, and local governmental agency operating funds. The coordinating board may adopt rules requiring an organization to demonstrate compliance with the matching funds requirement before the payment of the next installment under an awarded grant.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 859 (H.B. 437), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 48 (H.B. 626), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 49, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 136.007. RULES. The coordinating board shall adopt rules as necessary for the administration of this chapter, including rules regarding eligibility, program tuition and fees, administrative costs, matching funds, and case management and other supports for the program. The rules may include provisions for the payment in periodic installments of grant awards.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 859 (H.B. 437), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 50, eff. September 1, 2023.